Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.200

Administrative dissolution—Grounds.

The secretary of state may administratively dissolve a corporation under the circumstances and procedures provided in Article 6 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2127; 1994 c 287 s 7; 1991 c 72 s 37; 1990 c 178 s 5; 1989 c 165 s 160.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1990 c 178: See note following RCW 23B.01.220.